South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S1076.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Labor, Licensing and Regulation - Building Codes Council, relating to International Residential Code, designated as Regulation Document Number 5417, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The South Carolina Building Codes Council proposes to amend Chapter 8, Article 12, to reflect modifications to the 2024 South Carolina Building Codes, the International Residential Code. A Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on June 27, 2025. ----XX----